Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.435

Enumeration data used for population estimates—Destruction.

The office must destroy enumeration data collected under RCW 35.13.260, 35A.14.700, 36.13.030, and chapter 43.62 RCW after it is used to produce the required population estimates.

[ 2014 c 14 s 2.]